Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DOCUMENTARY CELEBRATING FRISBEE SPORTS IN MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Minnesota Frisbee Association to produce a documentary celebrating 50 years of Frisbee sports in Minnesota. new text end